Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4877.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.14, subdivision 1b, is amended to read: Subd. 1b. Maximum number of licenses. (a) Before July 1, 2026, the office may issue up to the maximum total number of licenses in each license category listed in paragraphs (b) and (c). (b) For licenses that are available to social equity applicants, the maximum number of licenses that the office may issue are: (1) cannabis cultivator licenses, 25; (2) cannabis manufacturer licenses, 12; (3) cannabis retailer licenses, 75; and (4) cannabis mezzobusiness licenses, 50. (c) For licenses that are available to all applicants, the maximum number of licenses that the office may issue are: (1) cannabis cultivator licenses, 25; (2) cannabis manufacturer licenses, 12; (3) cannabis retailer licenses, 75; and (4) cannabis mezzobusiness licenses, 50. (d) Beginning July 1, 2026, the office must determine the number of cannabis cultivator licenses, cannabis manufacturer licenses, cannabis retailer licenses, and cannabis mezzobusiness licenses that the office will issue consistent with the goals identified in subdivision 1a. If the office makes any of those types of licenses available, the number of licenses available to social equity applicants must be equal to or greater than the number of licenses available to all applicants. (e) The office may issue as many new text begin cannabis microbusiness new text end licenses as the office deems necessary deleted text begin of a license type that is not listed in this subdivisiondeleted text end . deleted text begin If the office limits the number of license types not listed in this subdivision available in any licensing period,deleted text end The office must identify the number of new text begin cannabis microbusiness new text end licenses available to social equity applicants and the number of new text begin cannabis microbusiness new text end licenses available to all applicants. The number of new text begin cannabis microbusiness new text end licenses available to social equity applicants must be equal to or greater than the number of new text begin cannabis microbusiness new text end licenses available to all applicants.new text begin The office must not limit the number of cannabis wholesaler licenses, cannabis transporter licenses, cannabis testing facility licenses, cannabis event organizer licenses, or cannabis delivery service licenses.new text end The office is not required to issue a license for a license type that is deleted text begin notdeleted text end listed in this deleted text begin subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin paragraphnew text end . (f) The office is not required to issue licenses to meet the maximum number of licenses that may be issued under paragraphs (b) and (c). Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.14, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Licensing periods; initial application. (a) The office must announce the commencement of a licensing period in advance of accepting applications for deleted text begin cannabis business licensesdeleted text end new text begin cannabis cultivator licenses, cannabis manufacturer licenses, cannabis retailer licenses, cannabis microbusiness licenses, or cannabis mezzobusiness licensesnew text end . At a minimum, the announcement must include: (1) the types of licenses that will be available during the licensing period; (2) if the office limits the number of a type of license that will be available, the number of that type of license available in the licensing period; (3) the date on which the office will begin accepting applications; and (4) the date on which the office will no longer accept applications. new text begin (b) The office must accept applications for cannabis wholesaler licenses, cannabis transporter licenses, cannabis testing facility licenses, cannabis event organizer licenses, or cannabis delivery service licenses at any time. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end An applicant must submit all required information and the applicable application fee to the office on the forms and in the manner prescribed by the office. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end If the office receives an application that fails to provide the required information or pay the applicable application fee, the office shall issue a deficiency notice to the applicant. The applicant may submit the required information or pay the required application fee within 14 calendar days from the date of the deficiency notice. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end Failure by an applicant to submit all required information or pay the application fee to the office will result in the application being rejected.